Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Subchapter 1. Uniform Desertion and Nonsupport Act

§ 201.
Definitions.

The word “child,” as used in this subchapter, shall mean a child who is under the age of 18 years, or is under the age of 21 years and is a student regularly attending a school, college or university or their equivalent, or is regularly attending a course of vocational or technical training designed to fit him for gainful employment, and shall include a “stepchild” under such age.
The words “adult child,” as so used, shall mean a child over the age of minority.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 98

, § 1, eff. April 22, 1971.

§ 202.
Penalty for desertion or nonsupport.

A married person who, without just cause, shall desert or willfully neglect or refuse to provide for the support and maintenance of his or her spouse and children, leaving them in destitute or necessitous circumstances or a parent who, without lawful excuse, shall desert or willfully neglect or refuse to provide for the support and maintenance of his or her child or an adult child possessed of sufficient pecuniary or physical ability to support his or her parents, who unreasonably neglects or refuses to provide such support when the parent is destitute, unable to support himself or herself, and resident in this State, shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $300.00, or both.
Should a fine be imposed, the court may order the same to be paid in whole or in part to the needy spouse, parent,or to the guardian, custodian, or trustee of the child.
The Office of Child Support attorneys, in addition to any other duly authorized person, may prosecute cases under this section in Vermont Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § C21.

§ 203.
Institution of proceedings.

Proceedings under this subchapter may be instituted by any prosecuting officer upon complaint made by the deserted married person, child, or by any other person, including a parent in proper cases, against a spouse, parent, or adult child, accused of an offense named in section 202 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 68, eff. April 9, 1974; 1987,

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 204.
Temporary orders.

At any time before the trial, upon application of the complainant and upon notice to the respondent, the court, or a judge thereof in vacation, may enter such temporary order as may seem just providing for the support of the deserted spouse or child, or both, or of such parents, pendente lite, and may punish for violation of such order as for contempt.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 205.
Order for payment; probation; recognizance.

Before the trial, with the consent of the respondent, or at the trial on entry of a plea of guilty, or after conviction, instead of imposing the penalty provided in section 202 of this title, or in addition thereto, the court, in its discretion, having regard to the circumstances and to the financial ability or earning capacity of the respondent, may make an order that shall be subject to change by the court from time to time, as circumstances may require, directing the respondent to pay a certain sum periodically to the spouse or to the guardian or custodian of the child or to an organization or individual approved by the court as trustee or to a parent or his or her guardian.
Such court may order the respondent released from custody and placed on probation, upon his or her entering into a recognizance, with or without surety, in such sum as the court, or a judge thereof in vacation, may order and approve.
The condition of the recognizance shall be such that if the respondent shall make his or her personal appearance in court whenever ordered so to do and shall further comply with the terms of such order of support, or of any subsequent modification thereof, such recognizance shall be void, otherwise in full force and effect.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 206.
Proceedings on failure to comply.

If the court is satisfied by information and due proof under oath that the respondent has violated the terms of such order, it may forthwith proceed with the trial of the respondent under the original charge, or sentence him or her under the original conviction or enforce the suspended sentence, as the case may be.
In case of forfeiture of a recognizance and enforcement thereof by execution, the sum recovered, in the discretion of the court, may be paid in whole or in part to the spouse or to the guardian, custodian or trustee of the child, or to a parent or his or her guardian.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 207.
Evidence; competency of parties as witnesses.

Other evidence shall not be required to prove the civil marriage of the husband and wife, or that the respondent is the father or mother or stepfather or stepmother of the child, than is or shall be required to prove such facts in a civil action.
In a prosecution under this subchapter, any existing statute or rule of law prohibiting the disclosure of confidential communications between husband and wife shall not apply, and both husband and wife shall be competent witnesses to testify against each other to any and all relevant matters, including the fact of the civil marriage and the parentage of the child; provided that neither shall be compelled to give self-incriminating evidence.
Proof of the desertion of the husband or wife or child in destitute circumstances or of neglect or refusal to provide for the support and maintenance of the husband, wife, or child shall be prima facie evidence that the desertion, neglect, or refusal is willful.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§ 208.
Repealed.
1973, No. 201 (Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 209.
Disposition, care, and maintenance of children.

When a parent is found guilty of nonsupport or desertion of his or her child, the court may enter such order or judgment relating to the disposition, care, and maintenance of such child, either by committing the child to the Department for Children and Families or to some person or suitable institution, as shall be equitable in the premises. The court may enforce the same by execution or by any proper proceedings. The property of such parent shall not be exempt from levy and sale under execution.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 27.

§ 210.
Construction.

This subchapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effect its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.